Utah statutes.
63A-11-105.   Office -- Duties, functions, and responsibilities.
(1)  The duties, functions, and responsibilities of the office include the
following:
(a)  to provide assistance and advice to parental defense attorneys;
(b)  to develop and provide educational and training programs for parental
defense attorneys; and
(c)  to provide information and advice to assist parental defense attorneys to
comply with their professional, contractual, and ethical duties.
(2)  The director may contract with a qualified person to fulfill the
requirements of Subsection (1).
(3)  The office may develop and enter into contracts with attorneys authorized
to practice law in the state, as independent contractors, to serve as parental
defense attorneys.
